Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1507.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(i) College students.--(1) A college student who attends a college or university located within this Commonwealth shall be eligible for a resident hunting license if the college student: (i) Has applied to an issuing agent or the commission.(ii) Provides a valid college identification card as proof of enrollment.(iii) Pays the issuing agent or the commission a license fee and issuing agent fee as provided in section 12345678910111213141516171819 2709 (relating to license costs and fees).(2) A college student eligible under paragraph (1) may be eligible for license and fee exemptions for no more than four consecutive years.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1507PN1762 - 2 - 12345